Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 8. Directors and Officers

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of shareholders, directors and officers where corporate business is continued after its dissolution, 72 ALR4th 419.

Liability of corporate director, officer or employee for tortious interference with corporation's contract with another, 72 ALR4th 492.